Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.3952, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Grants. Grants awarded under this section may fund up to deleted text begin 75deleted text end new text begin 90new text end percent of the total cost of a project and must otherwise adhere to section 116J.395, subdivisions 1 to 6 and subdivision 7, paragraph (b). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end